Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 609.415 is amended to read:
609.415. (1) As used in this section and ORS 609.420:
(a) “Animal” means any nonhuman mammal, bird, reptile, amphibian or fish.
(b) “Animal rescue entity” means  an individual or organization, including but not limited to an
animal control agency, humane  society, animal shelter, animal sanctuary or boarding kennel not
subject to ORS 167.374,  but excluding a veterinary facility, that keeps, houses and maintains in
[its] the individual’s  or organization’s  legal custody 10 or more animals, whether physically lo-
cated at a facility operated by the [ entity] individual or organization or kept, housed or maintained
elsewhere, and that solicits or accepts donations in any form.
(c) “Enforcing agency” means the [ agency that operates a city or county dog licensing and  control
program under ORS 609.035 to  609.110 or under any city or county ordinances or regulations that
operate in lieu of ORS 609.035 to 609.110, or any other agency designated the enforcing  agency by the
city or county governing body ] State Veterinarian .
(2) Any animal  rescue entity shall comply with all of the following record-keeping requirements:
(a) Maintain a record for each animal that identifies:
(A) The date of birth for the animal or, if the date of birth is unknown, the approximate age  of
the animal;
(B) The date the animal rescue entity acquired possession, control or charge  of the animal and
the source of the animal;
(C) The  number of offspring the animal produced while in the possession or control of the animal
rescue entity, if applicable;
(D) The disposition the  animal rescue entity makes of each animal possessed by, controlled by
or in the charge  of the animal rescue entity, including the date of disposition, manner of disposition
and the name and address for any individual or organization taking possession, control or  charge
of an animal;
(E) The source of the animal, date of acquisition, age, sex, breed type and weight of  the animal
at intake; and
(F) A photograph of the animal taken within 24 hours of intake by the animal rescue entity.
(b) Permit an authorized representative of the enforcing agency to inspect records of the animal
rescue entity required by this subsection and  furnish reports and information required by the en-
forcing agency, as provided under ORS 609.420.
(3) An animal rescue entity shall comply with the following licensing requirements:
Enrolled Senate Bill 883 (SB 883-A) Page 1
(a) The entity shall obtain a license  issued by the enforcing agency in accordance with this
section and any rules or policies adopted by the enforcing agency; and
(b) The entity shall pay a reasonable fee, as determined by the enforcing agency, for a license
or an annual  renewal of the license to provide for the actual cost of enforcing this section and ORS
609.420.
(4) The enforcing agency may not issue or renew a license under this  section unless the animal
rescue entity is in compliance with this section and ORS 609.420.
(5) An animal  rescue entity may transfer a license issued under this section to another person
with the written consent of the enforcing agency, provided that the transferee otherwise  qualifies
to be licensed as an animal rescue entity under this section and rules applicable to the  transferee
and does not have a certified unpaid debt to the state. The transferee shall submit  a signed release
to the enforcing agency permitting the  performance of a background investigation of the transferee,
and the enforcing agency shall conduct the background investigation.
(6) An applicant for a license issued under this section shall demonstrate that  the animal rescue
entity that is the subject of the  application complies with all standards imposed under applicable
law.
(7) Any animal rescue  entity is subject to inspection by the enforcing agency as provided in ORS
609.420.
(8)(a) A violation of this section may result in imposition of civil penalties  to be determined by
the enforcing agency, including but not limited to impoundment of all animals under the  animal
rescue’s control, the revocation of the animal rescue’s license to operate animal  rescue operations
and a civil penalty of not more than $500 for each violation.
(b) Before a  civil penalty may be imposed under this section, the enforcing agency shall adopt
rules or policies that:
(A) Ensure that a person who is the subject of  an alleged violation receives notice of the
allegations and potential imposition of civil penalties;
(B) Allow for an opportunity for a hearing prior to the imposition of civil penalties; and
(C) Allow for the opportunity for judicial review of the imposition of civil penalties.
(9) Moneys  raised by the enforcing agency under this section are dedicated to and shall be used
for enforcing agency operations undertaken pursuant to this section and ORS 609.420.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to  the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $316,133  for the purposes of enforcing and regulating
animal rescue entities, as defined in ORS 609.415.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter , Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House
Bill 5002),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and in-
cluding federal funds for contract  services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter , Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5002), col-
lected or received by the State Department of Agriculture  for food safety is increased by
$114,168 for the purposes of enforcing and regulating animal  rescue entities, as defined in
ORS 609.415.
Enrolled Senate Bill 883 (SB 883-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 883 (SB 883-A) Page 3